Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1045
Practices regulated under the Cosmetology, Electrology, Esthetics, Nail Technology, and Body Art Practice Act, defined.

Practices regulated under the Cosmetology, Electrology, Esthetics, Nail Technology, and Body Art Practice Act means body art, cosmetology, electrology, esthetics, and nail technology.

Laws 2004, LB 906, § 13;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-363.01;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 307.